Utah statutes.
9-3-503.   Executive director -- Powers and duties.
(1)  The members shall appoint an executive director who shall be an employee
of the authority, but who may not be a member of the authority, and who shall
serve at the pleasure of the members and receive compensation as set by the
members and approved by the governor.
(2)  The executive director shall:
(a)  administer, manage, and direct the affairs and activities of the
authority in accordance with the policies, control, and direction of the
members;
(b)  approve all accounts for allowable expenses of the authority or of any of
its employees and expenses incidental to the operation of the authority;
(c)  attend the meetings of the authority;
(d)  keep a record of the proceedings of the authority;
(e)  maintain and be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with
the authority; and
(f)  perform other duties as directed by the members in carrying out the
purposes of this part.
